Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB122.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Subchapter B of Chapter 53 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5329.1. Jurisdiction of certain international organizations.The World Health Organization, United Nations and the World Economic Forum shall have no jurisdiction or power within this Commonwealth. A rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy or mandate of any kind of the World Health Organization, United Nations or the World Economic Forum may not be enforced or implemented by this Commonwealth or any agency, department, board, commission, political subdivision, governmental entity of this Commonwealth, municipality or any other political entity.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0122PN0104 - 2 - 1